Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 5. Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Reservoir Police Officer Law of 1978.

§ 51-9-171.
Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Reservoir Police Officer Law of 1978.

This article shall be cited as “The Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Reservoir Police Officer Law of 1978.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 316, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 477, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 51-9-173.
Definitions.

For purposes of this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein:

“District” means the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District.

“Qualified person” means a person who:

Has met all the educational and training requirements of a course of study prescribed and conducted by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Training Academy; and

Is of good moral character and has not been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 511, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1978).

§ 51-9-175.
Appointment; oath; badge; powers; reimbursement by district.

The board of directors of the district may appoint and commission qualified persons as reservoir police officers of the district. Any such reservoir police officer so appointed shall be certified by the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training or in accordance with the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training and shall attain certification or recertification within one (1) year of appointment, and shall at all times be answerable and responsible to the board of directors of the district.

A reservoir police officer appointed and commissioned as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall, before entering upon his duties as such officer, take the oath of office prescribed by Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, which shall be endorsed upon his commission. The commission, with the oath endorsed upon it, shall be entered in the official minute book of the district.

A reservoir police officer appointed and commissioned pursuant to the provisions of this article, shall, while engaged in the performance of his duties, carry on his person a badge identifying him as a reservoir police officer of the district and an identification card issued by the district. When in uniform, each such reservoir police officer shall wear his badge in plain view.

A reservoir police officer may exercise the same powers of arrest and the right to bear firearms that may be exercised by any state, municipal or other police officer in this state, but only with respect to violations of law or violations of regulations adopted pursuant to Section 51-9-127, which are committed on the property owned by the district. This includes property which is owned by the district but has been leased or rented to other parties. Any right granted under this subsection in no way relieves the requirements of appropriate affidavit and warrant for arrest from the appropriate jurisdiction and authority pursuant to the laws of this state.

On behalf of each person who is trained as a reservoir police officer at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Training Academy, the district shall be required to pay to the academy at least an amount equal to the per student cost of operation of the academy as tuition.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 511, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 316, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 477, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 51-9-176.
Authority to render law enforcement services in emergency situations and participate in multijurisdictional training, law enforcement and emergency operations; command structure; reimbursement for expenses.

At the request of a Mississippi municipality, county, other legal political subdivision of the state or a Mississippi state agency, federal agency, or under a declaration of a state of emergency or disaster by the Governor or the President of the United States, the officers of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Reservoir Police may render law enforcement services including search and rescue using Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Reservoir Police equipment. Officers of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Reservoir Police may also participate in joint multijurisdictional training exercises, multijurisdictional law enforcement operations and multijurisdictional search and rescue operations. The officers may exercise the law enforcement authority granted under Section 51-9-175 in the jurisdiction of the training, operation or emergency. The Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Reservoir Police, with the approval of the governing board, may enter into agreements with jurisdictions regarding the circumstances in which emergency assistance may be provided and administered. Unless otherwise directed by an agreement, officers will remain under the authority of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Reservoir Police Chief or to whomever and to what level of authority is delegated by the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Reservoir Police Chief or by assignment through the National Incident Management System or by the stated declaration of disaster or emergency. The Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Reservoir Police may seek reimbursement for services and related expenses if available.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 522, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 477, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 51-9-177.
Arrest and detention.

A person arrested by a reservoir police officer shall be handled or processed in the jurisdiction in which the offense was committed, in the same manner as if the arrest had been made by a sheriff or constable. If the reservoir police officer detains any person arrested by him, he shall forthwith deliver the arrested person to the sheriff of the county in which the offense was committed, and the reservoir police officer shall have no further authority as to the custody of such arrested person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 511, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 316, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 477, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 51-9-179.
Liability of district for acts.

The district, by the act of the appointment of any reservoir police officer, shall be liable and responsible for all acts of such reservoir police officer while he is acting or purporting to act under the provisions of this article, whether such action be authorized by this article or not; further, the district shall indemnify the State of Mississippi and any sheriff for any loss, costs or expenses incurred by virtue of any act, deed or omission committed by a reservoir police officer while he is acting or purporting to act under the provisions of this article, whether the act, deed or omission is authorized by this article or not.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 511, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 316, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 477, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 51-9-181.
Bonds.

Each reservoir police officer commissioned under this article shall file a bond in the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) with the district for the lawful and faithful performance of his duties. The cost of the bond shall be borne by the district. The filing of the bond shall not relieve the district from any civil liability it may otherwise incur in accordance with the provisions of Section 51-9-179. The district shall indemnify and hold the State of Mississippi, the Commissioner of Public Safety, and any sheriff harmless from any and all liability which any or all of them might otherwise incur for the negligent or unlawful acts of a reservoir police officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 511, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 316, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 477, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 51-9-183.
Termination of authority.

The powers and authority of any reservoir police officer, whether appointed or commissioned pursuant to the provisions of this article or any former law of this state, may be terminated at any time by the board of directors of the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 511, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 316, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 477, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 51-9-185.
Waiver of sovereign immunity.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed to waive the sovereign immunity of the State of Mississippi or the district, in whole or in part.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 511, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1978).